West Virginia, session 2026, SB1084.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:That the balance of the funds available for expenditure in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, Department of Human Services, Women’s Commission Operating Fund, fund 5450, be decreased by expiring the amount of $8051.62 to the unappropriated surplus balance of the State Fund, General Revenue to be available for appropriation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.And, That the total appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to fund 0293, fiscal year 2026, organization 0293, be supplemented and amended by adding a new item of appropriation: Title II – Appropriations. Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. Department of Tourism 45 –Division of Culture and History– (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0293 FY 2026 Org 0432		General	Appro-	Revenue	priation	Fund 6a	WV Women’s Suffragist Monument– Surplus		xxxxx		8,051 NOTE: The purpose of this supplemental appropriation bill is to expire funds to the surplus balance of General Revenue and to supplement and add a new item of appropriation in the aforesaid account for the designated spending unit for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home